Utah statutes.
76-7-324.   Violation of restrictions on public funds for contraceptive or abortion services as misdemeanor.

Any agent of a state agency or political subdivision, acting alone or in concert with others, who violates Section 76-7-322, 76-7-323, or 76-7-331 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

